Washington statutes.
RCW 35.84.010

Electric energy—Sale of—Purchase.

Every city or town owning its own electric power and light plant, shall have the right to sell and dispose of electric energy to any other city or town, public utility district, governmental agency, or municipal corporation, mutual association, or to any person, firm, or corporation, inside or outside its corporate limits, and to purchase electric energy therefrom.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.84.010. Prior: 1933 c 51 s 1; RRS s 9209-1.]

NOTES:

Reduced utility rates for low-income senior citizens and other low-income citizens: RCW 74.38.070.